Alaska, session 34, SB26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 06 Article 5. Standard Time. 07 Sec. 44.12.400. Exemption from daylight saving time. The state exempts 08 itself from observation of advanced time, also known as daylight saving time, during 09 the period set under 15 U.S.C. 260a for the advancement of time each calendar year, 10 and the entire state shall observe the standard time that is otherwise applicable during 11 that period. 12 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 PETITION TO THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 15 TO CHANGE THE TIME ZONES IN WHICH ALASKA IS LOCATED. The legislature, by 01 this Act, petitions the United States Department of Transportation to initiate proceedings 02 under the Uniform Time Act of 1966 to place all of the state east of longitude -155.00 W, 03 with minor variations as requested by proximate communities, within the Pacific Standard 04 Time zone as provided in the United States Department of Transportation's "Procedure for 05 Moving an Area from One Time Zone to Another." 06 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 07 read: 08 CONDITIONAL REPEAL. Section 2 of this Act is repealed if the United States 09 Department of Transportation does not place all of the state east of longitude -155.00 W, with 10 minor variations as requested by proximate communities, within the Pacific Standard Time 11 zone by January 1, 2028. 12 * Sec. 4. Section 2 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 13 * Sec. 5. Section 1 of this Act takes effect on the earlier of the following: 14 (1) the date on which the United States Department of Transportation places 15 all of the state east of longitude -155.00 W, with minor variations as requested by proximate 16 communities, within the Pacific Standard Time zone; 17 (2) March 11, 2028. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.